Utah statutes.
53A-14-101.   Creation of commission -- Powers -- Payment of expenses.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall appoint a State Instructional Materials Commission consisting of:

(a)  the state superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;

(b)  a school district superintendent;

(c)  a secondary school principal;

(d)  an elementary school principal;

(e)  a secondary school teacher;

(f)  an elementary school teacher;

(g)  five persons not employed in public education; and

(h)  a dean of a school of education of a state college or university.

(2)  The commission shall evaluate instructional materials for recommendation by the board.

(3)  As used in this chapter, "instructional materials" means textbooks or materials used as, or in place, of textbooks and which may be used within the state curriculum framework for courses of study by students in public schools to include:

(a)  textbooks;

(b)  workbooks;

(c)  computer software;

(d)  laserdiscs or videodiscs; and

(e)  multiple forms of communications media.

(4)  Members shall serve without compensation, but their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties shall be paid out of money appropriated to the board.

